California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Methods of Levy [488.300. - 488.485.]

488.300.

If the method of levy under a writ of execution is incorporated by this article, for the purposes of this article references in Article 4 (commencing with Section 700.010) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 9 to:

(a) “Judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(b) “Judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant.

(c) “Notice of levy” shall be deemed references to a notice of attachment. 

(d) “Writ” shall be deemed references to a writ of attachment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.305.

At the time of levy pursuant to this article or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.315.

To attach real property, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.015 and the recorder shall index the copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment as provided in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.325.

To attach (1) growing crops, (2) timber to be cut, or (3) minerals or the like (including oil and gas) to be extracted or accounts receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.020 and the recorder shall index the copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment as provided in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.335.

Unless another method of attachment is provided by this article, to attach tangible personal property in the possession or under the control of the defendant, the levying officer shall take the property into custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.345.

Unless another method of attachment is provided by this article, to attach tangible personal property in the possession or under the control of a third person, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.355.

(a) To attach personal property in the custody of a levying officer, the plaintiff or levying officer shall comply with subdivision (a) of Section 700.050.

(b) The levying officer having custody of the property shall comply with the writs in the order they are received and is not subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 488.600).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.365.

To attach goods in the possession of a bailee (as defined in Section 7102 of the Commercial Code) other than one who has issued a negotiable document of title therefor, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.060.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.375.

(a) Except as provided by Section 488.385, to attach equipment of a going business in the possession or under the control of the defendant, the levying officer shall file with the office of the Secretary of State a notice of attachment, in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, which shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and mailing address of the plaintiff.

(2) The name and last known mailing address of the defendant.

(3) The title of the court where the action is pending and the cause and number of the action.

(4) A description of the specific property attached.

(5) A statement that the plaintiff has acquired an attachment lien on the specified property of the defendant.

(b) Upon presentation of a notice of attachment under this section for filing, and tender of the filing fee to the office of the Secretary of State, the notice of attachment shall be filed, marked, and indexed in the same manner as a financing statement. The fee for filing in the office of the Secretary of State is the same as the fee for filing a financing statement in the standard form.

(c) Upon the request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate showing whether there is on file in that office on the date and hour stated therein any notice of attachment filed against the equipment of a particular person named in the
 request. If a notice of attachment is on file, the certificate shall state the date and hour of filing of each such notice and any notice affecting any such notice of attachment and the name and address of the plaintiff. Upon request, the Secretary of State shall furnish a copy of any notice of attachment or notice affecting a notice of attachment. The certificate shall be issued as part of a combined certificate pursuant to Section 9528 of the Commercial Code, and the fee for the certificate and copies shall be in accordance with that section.

(d) The fee for filing, indexing, and furnishing filing data for a notice of extension of attachment is the same as the fee for a continuation statement under Section 9525 of the Commercial Code. The fee for filing, indexing, and furnishing filing data for a notice of release of attachment is the same as the fee for a statement of release under Section 9525 of the Commercial Code.

(e) If property subject to an attachment lien under this section becomes a fixture (as defined in paragraph (41) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102
 of the Commercial Code), the attachment lien under this section is extinguished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 7.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

488.385.

(a) To attach a vehicle or vessel for which a certificate of ownership has been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, or a mobilehome or commercial coach for which a certificate of title has been issued by the Department of Housing and Community Development, which is equipment of a going business in the possession or under the control of the defendant, the levying officer shall file with the appropriate department a notice of attachment, in the form prescribed by the appropriate department, which shall contain all of the
following:

(1) The name and mailing address of the plaintiff.

(2) The name and last known mailing address of the defendant.

(3) The title of the court where the action is pending and the cause and number of the action.

(4) A description of the specific property attached.

(5) A statement that the plaintiff has acquired an attachment lien on the specific property of the defendant.

(b) Upon presentation of a notice of attachment, notice of extension, or notice of release under this section for filing and tender of the filing fee to the appropriate department, the notice shall be filed and indexed. The fee for filing and indexing
the notice is fifteen dollars ($15).

(c) Upon the request of any person, the department shall issue its certificate showing whether there is on file in that department on the date and hour stated therein any notice of attachment filed against the property of a particular person named in the request. If a notice of attachment is on file, the certificate shall state the date and hour of filing of each such notice of attachment and any notice affecting any such notice of attachment and the name and address of the plaintiff. The fee for the certificate issued pursuant to this subdivision is fifteen dollars ($15). Upon request, the department shall furnish a copy of any notice of attachment or notice affecting a notice of attachment for a fee of one dollar ($1) per page.

(d) If property subject to an attachment lien under this section becomes a fixture (as defined in paragraph (41) of
subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code), the attachment lien under this section is extinguished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

488.395.

Except as specified in subdivision (e) and as provided by Sections 488.325 and 488.405:

(a) To attach farm products or inventory of a going business in the possession or under the control of the defendant, the levying officer shall place a keeper in charge of the property for the period prescribed by subdivisions (b) and (c). During the keeper period, the business may continue to operate in the ordinary course of business provided that all sales are final and are for cash or its equivalent.
For the purpose of this subdivision, a check is the equivalent of cash. The levying officer is not liable for accepting payment in the form of a cash equivalent. The keeper shall take custody of the proceeds from all sales unless otherwise directed by the plaintiff.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the period during which the business may continue to operate under the keeper is:

(1) Ten days, if the defendant is a natural person and the writ of attachment has been issued ex parte pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 484.510) of Chapter 4 or pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010).

(2) Two days, in cases not described in paragraph (1).

(c) Unless some other disposition is agreed upon by the plaintiff and the defendant, the
levying officer shall take the farm products or inventory into exclusive custody at the earlier of the following times:

(1) At any time the defendant objects to placement of a keeper in charge of the business.

(2) At the conclusion of the applicable period prescribed by subdivision (b).

(d) A defendant described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may claim an exemption pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 487.020 by following the procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 482.100 except that the requirement of showing changed circumstances under subdivision (a) of Section 482.100 does not apply. Upon a showing that the property is exempt pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 487.020, the court shall order the release of the exempt property and may make such further order as the court deems appropriate to
protect against frustration of the collection of the plaintiff’s claim. The order may permit the plaintiff to attach farm products or inventory of the going business and proceeds or after-acquired property, or both, by filing pursuant to Section 488.405 and may provide reasonable restrictions on the disposition of the property previously attached.

(e) This section does not apply to the placement of a keeper in a business for the purpose of attaching tangible personal property consisting solely of money or equivalent proceeds of sales, which shall be conducted in the same manner as provided in Section 700.070.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1159, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

488.405.

(a) This section provides an alternative method of attaching farm products or inventory of a going business in the possession or under the control of the defendant, but this section does not apply to property described in Section 488.325. This section applies if the plaintiff instructs the levying officer to attach the farm products or inventory under this section.

(b) To attach under this section farm products or inventory of a going business in the possession or under the control of the defendant, the levying officer shall file a notice of attachment with the Secretary of State.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), the filing of the notice of
 attachment gives the plaintiff an attachment lien on all of the following:

(1) The farm products or inventory described in the notice.

(2) Identifiable cash proceeds (as that term is used in Section 9315 of the Commercial Code).

(3) If permitted by the writ of attachment or court order, after-acquired property.

(d) The attachment lien created by the filing of the notice of attachment under this section does not extend to either of the following:

(1) A vehicle or vessel required to be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles or a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered pursuant to the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The inventory of a retail merchant held for sale except to the extent that the inventory of the retail merchant consists of durable goods having a unit retail value of at least five hundred dollars ($500). For the purposes of this paragraph, “retail merchant” does not include (A) a person whose sales for resale exceeded 75 percent in dollar volume of the person’s total sales of all goods during the 12 months preceding the filing of the notice of attachment or (B) a cooperative association organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code (agricultural cooperative associations) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 13200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code (Fish Marketing Act).

(e) If property subject to an attachment lien under this section becomes a fixture (as defined in paragraph (41) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code), the
 attachment lien under this section is extinguished.

(f) The notice of attachment shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and mailing address of the plaintiff.

(2) The name and last known mailing address of the defendant.

(3) The title of the court where the action is pending and the cause and number of the action.

(4) A description of the farm products and inventory attached.

(5) A statement that the plaintiff has acquired an attachment lien on the described property and on identifiable cash proceeds (as that term is used in Section 9315 of the Commercial
 Code) and, if permitted by the writ of attachment or court order, on after-acquired property.

(g) Upon presentation of a notice of attachment under this section for filing and tender of the filing fee to the office of the Secretary of State, the notice of attachment shall be filed, marked, and indexed in the same manner as a financing statement. The fee for filing in the office of the Secretary of State is the same as the fee for filing a financing statement in the standard form.

(h) Upon the request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate showing whether there is on file in that office on the date and hour stated therein any notice of attachment filed against the farm products or inventory of a particular person named in the request. If a notice of attachment is on file, the certificate shall state the date and hour of filing of each such notice of
 attachment and any notice affecting any such notice of attachment and the name and address of the plaintiff. Upon request, the Secretary of State shall furnish a copy of any notice of attachment or notice affecting a notice of attachment. The certificate shall be issued as part of a combined certificate pursuant to Section 9528 of the Commercial Code, and the fee for the certificate and copies shall be in accordance with that section.

(i) The fee for filing, indexing, and furnishing filing data for a notice of extension of attachment is the same as the fee for a continuation statement under Section 9525 of the Commercial Code. The fee for filing, indexing, and furnishing filing data for a notice of release of attachment is the same as the fee for a statement of release under Section
 9525 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 8.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

488.415.

To attach personal property used as a dwelling, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.080.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.425.

If a vehicle or vessel is attached and a certificate of ownership has been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the vehicle or vessel and the certificate of ownership is still in effect, or if a mobilehome or commercial coach is attached and a certificate of title has been issued by the Department of Housing and Community Development for the mobilehome or commercial coach and the certificate of title is still in effect, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.090.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.435.

(a) To attach chattel paper, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.100.

(b) In addition to any other rights created by a levy on chattel paper, the levy creates a lien on the defendant’s rights in specific goods subject to the chattel paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.440.

To attach an instrument, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.110.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.445.

To attach a negotiable document of title, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.120.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.450.

To attach a security, the levying officer shall comply with Section 8112 of the Commercial Code. The legal process referred to in Section 8112 of the Commercial Code means the legal process required by the state in which the chief executive office of the issuer of the security is located and, where that state is California, means personal service by the levying officer of a copy of the writ of attachment and notice of attachment on the person who is to be served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

488.455.

(a) Subject to Sections 488.465 and 684.115, to attach a deposit account, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the financial institution with which the deposit account is maintained.

(b) The attachment lien that arises upon service of a writ of attachment and notice of
attachment reaches only amounts in a deposit account at the time of service on the financial institution, including the amount of any deposit not yet finally collected, unless the deposit is returned unpaid to the financial institution.

(c) The levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on any third person in whose name any deposit account described therein stands. That service shall be made personally or by mail as follows:

(1) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, if the party seeking the levy informs the levying officer of that person and his, her, or its residence or business address.

(2) Promptly following the levying officer’s receipt of a garnishee’s memorandum if service was not accomplished pursuant to paragraph (1), if the garnishee’s memorandum identifies
that person and his, her, or its residence or business address.

(d) The financial institution shall not honor a withdrawal request or a check or other order for the payment of money from the deposit account if presentation of that withdrawal request or item to the financial institution occurs during the time the attachment lien is in effect unless, following that withdrawal or payment, sufficient funds are available to cover the levy. For these purposes, a withdrawal from the deposit account to cover the financial institution’s standard fee or charge for processing the levy shall not be considered a payment of money from the account in violation of this subdivision. 

(e) During the time the attachment lien is in effect, the financial institution is not liable to any person for any of the following:

(1) Performance of
the duties of a garnishee under the levy.

(2) Nonpayment of a check or other order for the payment or transfer of money drawn or presented against the deposit account if the nonpayment is pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(3) Refusal to pay a withdrawal from the deposit account if the refusal is pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(f) For the purposes of this section, none of the following is a third person in whose name the deposit account stands:

(1) A person who is only a person named as the beneficiary of a Totten trust account.

(2) A person who is only a payee designated in a pay-on-death provision in an account pursuant to Section 18318.5 of the Financial
Code or Section 5140 of the Probate Code, or other similar provision.

(3) A person who is only acting in a representative or custodial capacity with respect to benefits paid or payable by the United States government. Rather, accounts maintained by the representative or custodian shall be deemed to stand in that beneficiary’s name, and the amounts therein shall be covered by a levy against that beneficiary.

(g) For purposes of this section, final payment of a deposit shall be deemed to have occurred in accordance with Section 4215 or 11210 of the Commercial Code or with automated clearinghouse or Federal Reserve System rule, regulation, operating circular, or similar governing document, as applicable to the deposit. If, for any reason, a deposit is returned by the financial institution upon which it is drawn, that deposit shall not be deemed finally collected for purposes of this
subdivision regardless of any later payment by the financial institution upon which the deposit is drawn. 

(h) When a deposit account has been attached, as an alternative to paying the amount of the deposit account that is attached to the levying officer as required by Section 488.600, the financial institution may continue to hold the deposit account until the deposit account is levied upon after judgment in the action or is earlier released, the deposit account to be held in one of the following manners:

(1) If the entire deposit account is attached, the financial institution may hold the deposit account on the terms applicable before the attachment, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(2) If less than the entire deposit account is attached:

(A) With the consent of the defendant, and any third person in whose name the deposit account stands, the financial institution may hold in the deposit account on the same terms an amount larger than the attached amount as necessary to avoid a penalty or a reduction of the rate of interest.

(B) If the defendant, and any third person in whose name the deposit account stands, do not consent as provided in subparagraph (A), the financial institution may hold the attached amount on the same terms affecting the deposit account before the attachment, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(3) The financial institution may hold the attached deposit account in any other manner agreed upon by the plaintiff, the defendant, and any third person in whose name the deposit account stands.

(i) Subdivision (h)
does not prevent a financial institution that is holding an attached deposit account as provided in subdivision (h) from paying the attached amount to the levying officer before the time the financial institution otherwise is required to pay the amount under subdivision (h).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

488.460.

(a) Subject to Sections 488.465 and 684.115, to attach property in a safe-deposit box, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the financial institution with which the safe-deposit box is maintained.

(b) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer
shall serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on any third person in whose name the safe-deposit box stands.

(c) During the time the attachment lien is in effect, the financial institution may not permit the removal of any of the contents of the safe-deposit box except as directed by the levying officer.

(d) Upon receipt of a garnishee’s memorandum from the financial institution, as required by Section 488.610, indicating a safe-deposit box is under levy, the levying officer shall promptly mail a written notice to the judgment creditor demanding an additional fee as required by Section 26723 of the Government Code, plus the costs to open the safe-deposit box and seize and store the contents. The levying officer shall release the levy on the safe-deposit box if the plaintiff does not pay the required fee, plus costs, within three business days plus the
extended time period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 for service by mail by the levying officer.

(e) The levying officer may first give the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stands an opportunity to open the safe-deposit box to permit the removal pursuant to the attachment of the attached property. The financial institution may refuse to permit the forcible opening of the safe-deposit box to permit the removal of the attached property unless the plaintiff or levying officer pays in advance the cost of forcibly opening the safe-deposit box and of repairing any damage caused thereby.

(f) During the time the attachment lien is in effect, the financial institution is not liable to any person for any of the following:

(1) Performance of the duties of a garnishee under the attachment.

(2) Refusal to permit access to the safe-deposit box by the person in whose name it stands.

(3) Removal of any of the contents of the safe-deposit box pursuant to the attachment.

(g) If the levying officer removes any property from the safe-deposit box to satisfy the levy, but allows other property to remain in the safe-deposit box, the attachment lien is released automatically with respect to any property that remains in the safe-deposit box.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

488.465.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a deposit account or safe-deposit box standing in the name of a person other than the defendant, either alone or together with other third persons, is not subject to levy under Section 488.455 or 488.460 unless the levy is authorized by court order. The levying officer shall serve a copy of the court order on the third person at the time the copy of the writ of attachment and the notice of attachment are served on the third person.

(b) A court order is not required as a prerequisite to levy on a deposit account or
safe-deposit box standing in the name of any of the following:

(1) The defendant, whether alone or together with third persons.

(2) The defendant’s spouse, whether alone or together with other third persons. An affidavit showing that the person in whose name the account stands is the defendant’s spouse shall be delivered to the financial institution at the time of levy.

(3) A fictitious business name if an unexpired fictitious business name statement filed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code lists as the persons doing business under the fictitious business name either (A) the defendant or (B) the defendant’s spouse or (C) the defendant and the defendant’s spouse, but does not list any other person. A copy of a fictitious business name
statement, certified as provided in Section 17926 of the Business and Professions Code, that satisfies these requirements shall be delivered to the financial institution at the time of levy and, if a person other than the defendant is listed in the statement, an affidavit showing that the other person is the defendant’s spouse shall also be delivered to the financial institution at the time of levy.

(c) In any case where a deposit account in the name of a person other than the defendant, whether alone or together with the defendant, is levied upon, the financial institution shall not pay to the levying officer the amount levied upon until being notified to do so by the levying officer. The levying officer may not require the financial institution to pay the amount levied upon until the expiration of 15 days after service of notice of attachment on the third person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 6.3.)
-------------------------------------------

488.470.

(a) Unless another method of attachment is provided by this article, to attach an account receivable or general intangible, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the account debtor.

(b) If an attachment is made under subdivision (a) and payments on the account receivable or general intangible are made to a person other than the defendant (whether pursuant to a security agreement, assignment for collection, or otherwise), the levying officer shall, if so instructed by the plaintiff, personally serve
a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on such third person. Service of the copy of the writ and notice of attachment on the third person is an attachment of any amounts owed to the defendant by the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.475.

(a) The following property may be attached pursuant to this article notwithstanding that the property levied upon is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding:

(1) Real property.

(2) Growing crops, timber to be cut, or minerals or the like (including oil and gas) to be extracted or accounts receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead.

(3) Tangible personal property in the possession or under the
control of the defendant or in the custody of a levying officer.

(4) The interest of a defendant in personal property in the estate of a decedent, whether the interest arises by testate or intestate succession.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), attachment of property that is the subject of an action or special proceeding pending at the time of the attachment is not effective.

(c) If attachment is attempted but is ineffective under subdivision (b) and the levying officer has requested a garnishee’s memorandum under Section 488.610 in connection with the ineffective attachment, the garnishee’s memorandum shall include the following information in addition to that required by Section 488.610:

(1) A statement that the attachment of the property is
not effective because the property is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding.

(2) The title of the court and the cause and number of the pending action or proceeding.

(d) For the purpose of this section, an action or proceeding is pending from the time the action or proceeding is commenced until judgment has been entered and the time for appeal has expired or, if an appeal is filed, until the appeal has been finally determined.

(e) Nothing in this section affects or limits the right of the plaintiff to obtain a lien pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 491.410) of Chapter 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.480.

(a) As used in this section, “final money judgment” means a money judgment after the time for appeal from the judgment has expired or, if an appeal is filed, after the appeal has been finally determined.

(b) To attach a final money judgment, the levying officer shall file a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment with the clerk of the court that entered the final money judgment. The court clerk shall endorse upon the judgment a statement of the existence of the attachment lien and the time it was created. If an abstract of the judgment is
issued, it shall include a statement of the attachment lien in favor of the plaintiff.

(c) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the judgment debtor obligated to pay the final money judgment attached.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------

488.485.

(a) To attach the interest of the defendant in personal property in the estate of a decedent, whether the interest arises by testate or intestate succession, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on the personal representative of the decedent. The attachment does not impair the powers of the representative over the property for the purposes of administration.

(b) The personal representative shall report the attachment to the court in which the estate is being administered when any petition for
distribution is filed. If a decree orders distribution to the defendant, the court making the decree shall order the attached property to be deliverd to the levying officer. The property may not be delivered to the levying officer until the decree distributing the propety has become final. To the extent the property delivered to the levying officer is not necessary to satisfy the attachment, it shall be released to the defendant.

(c) Promptly after the property is delivered to the levying officer pursuant to subdivision (b), the levying officer shall serve a notice describing the property on the defendant. Notwithstanding Sections 484.070, 484.350, 484.530, and 485.610, a claim of exemption for the property described in the notice may be made within 10 days after the notice was served on the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lien of Attachment [488.500. - 488.510.]

488.500.

(a) A levy on property under a writ of attachment creates an attachment lien on the property from the time of levy until the expiration of the time provided by Section 488.510.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), if property subject to an attachment lien is transferred or encumbered, the property transferred or encumbered remains subject to the lien after the transfer or encumbrance to the same extent that the property would
remain subject to an execution lien pursuant to Sections 697.720 to 697.750, inclusive.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this title, if equipment is attached pursuant to Section 488.375 or farm products or inventory is attached pursuant to Section 488.405, the attachment lien on the property covered by the attachment lien has the same force and effect as a judgment lien on personal property created at the same time would have pursuant to Sections 697.590 to 697.620, inclusive.

(d) If equipment consisting of a vehicle, vessel, mobilehome, or commercial coach is attached pursuant to Section 488.385, the attachment lien on the specified property does not affect the rights of a person who is a bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer and obtains possession of both the property and its certificate of ownership issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or its certificate of title or
registration card issued by the Department of Housing and Community Development. If the levying officer obtains possession of the certificate of ownership or certificate of title or registration card, the attachment lien has the priority of the lien of a lien creditor under Sections 9317 and 9323 of the Commercial Code as of the time possession is obtained by the levying officer. If the levying officer does not obtain possession of the certificate of ownership or certificate of title or registration card, the attachment lien has the same force and effect as an unperfected security interest that attached at the same time as the notice of attachment was filed.

(e) If an attachment lien is created on property that is subject to the lien of a temporary protective order or a lien under Article 1 (commencing with Section 491.110) of Chapter 11, the priority of the attachment lien relates back to the date the earlier lien was created. Nothing in this
subdivision affects priorities or rights of third persons established while the lien of the temporary protective order or the lien under Article 1 (commencing with Section 491.110) of Chapter 11 was in effect as determined under the law governing the effect of such lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

488.510.

(a) Unless sooner released or discharged, any attachment shall cease to be of any force or effect, and the property levied upon shall be released from the operation of the attachment, at the expiration of three years from the date of issuance of the writ of attachment under which the levy was made.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), upon motion of the plaintiff, made not less than 10 or more than 60 days before the expiration of the three-year period and upon notice of not less than five days to the defendant whose property is attached, the court in which the
action is pending may, by order filed prior to the expiration of the period and for good cause, extend the time of the attachment for a period not exceeding one year from the date on which the attachment would otherwise expire.

(c) The levying officer shall serve notice of the order upon any person holding property pursuant to an attachment and shall record or file the notice in any office where the writ and notice of attachment are recorded or filed prior to the expiration of the period described in subdivision (a) or any extension thereof. Where the attached property is real property, the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney, instead of the levying officer, may record the required notice.

(d) Any attachment may be extended from time to time in the manner prescribed in this section, but the maximum period of the attachment, including the extensions, shall not exceed eight years
from the date of issuance of the writ of attachment under which the levy of attachment was made.

(e) The death of the defendant whose property is attached does not terminate the attachment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Duties and Liabilities of Third Persons After Levy [488.600. - 488.620.]

488.600.

(a) Sections 701.010, 701.020, 701.040, 701.050, 701.060, and 701.070 prescribe duties and liabilities of a third person under a levy made under this title.

(b) For the purposes of this section, references in Sections 701.010, 701.020, 701.040, 701.050, and 701.060 to:

(1) “Amount required to satisfy the judgment” shall be deemed references to the amount required to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(2) “Execution lien” or “lien” shall be deemed references to the attachment lien.
